Utah statutes.
63G-2-307.   Duty to evaluate records and make designations and classifications.

(1)  A governmental entity shall:

(a)  evaluate all record series that it uses or creates;

(b)  designate those record series as provided by this chapter and Title 63A, Chapter 12, Part 1, Archives and Records Service; and

(c)  report the designations of its record series to the state archives.

(2)  A governmental entity may classify a particular record, record series, or information within a record at any time, but is not required to classify a particular record, record series, or information until access to the record is requested.

(3)  A governmental entity may redesignate a record series or reclassify a record or record series, or information within a record at any time.

